Tennessee, session 114, SB1196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-232, is amended by adding
the following new subsection (d):
(d) If approved by the board for licensing health care facilities, an assisted-care
living facility may comply with any requirement to post information in the facility by
making such information available on an electronic screen clearly visible to residents
and the public.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1196
002621
- 1 -